Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-4037
Funds and grants; use.

Any city which has established one or more business improvement districts is authorized to receive, administer, and disburse donated funds or grants of federal or state funds for the purposes of and in the manner authorized by the Business Improvement District Act.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 23;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 230.